Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-461
Muskrats or beavers; permit to destroy;
violation; penalty.

If any dam, canal, drainage
ditch, irrigation ditch, private fish pond, aquaculture facility, artificial
waterway, railroad embankment, or other property is being damaged or destroyed
by muskrats or beavers,
the commission may issue a permit to the person
who owns or controls the property allowing the person or his or her designee to
take or destroy such muskrats or
beavers. The muskrats, beavers, or parts thereof taken under the authority
of such permit shall not be sold or used unless the permitholder also possesses
a fur-harvesting permit that is current or valid at the time of the sale or
use. The commission may adopt
and promulgate rules and regulations in connection with the issuance
of such permits. Any person
violating this section shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor and shall
be fined at least fifty dollars.

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 171;

Laws 2011, LB41, § 13.